Maine, session 132, LD1351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4553, sub-§1-I is enacted to read:
1-I. Antisemitism. "Antisemitism" has the same meaning as the nonlegally binding
working definition of "antisemitism" adopted by the International Holocaust Remembrance
Alliance Plenary in Bucharest, Romania on May 26, 2016.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §4554, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Antisemitism as motive. When determining whether a violation of this Act or any
criminal or civil law has occurred, an assessment of whether antisemitism was a motive, if
relevant, for that violation must be made.